Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.037

Nurse hotline, when funded.

To the extent that funding is provided specifically for this purpose, the director shall provide all persons enrolled in health plans under this chapter and chapters 70.47 and 74.09 RCW with access to a twenty-four hour, seven day a week nurse hotline.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 58; 2007 c 259 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—Report—Agency transfer—References to head of health care authority—Draft legislation—2011 1st sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 74.09.010.

Subheadings not law—2007 c 259: See note following RCW 7.70.060.